Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-434
Drug treatment centers; provide course of instruction.

All drug treatment centers shall provide the necessary facilities and programs to carry out the provisions of section 29-433.

Laws 1978, LB 808, § 5;

Laws 2004, LB 1083, § 87.